Utah statutes.
26-43-102.   Gathering of information.
The department shall obtain annually publicly available information regarding
cigarettes and tobacco products from other states and sources concerning:
(1)  the presence of the following substances in detectable levels in a burned
state and, if the cigarette or tobacco product is typically burned when
consumed, in a burned state:
(a)  ammonia or ammonia compounds;
(b)  arsenic;
(c)  cadmium;
(d)  formaldehyde; and
(e)  lead; and
(2)  a nicotine yield rating for the cigarette or tobacco product for which a
rating has been developed.
